Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.110

Improper conduct by certain justices.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any judge or justice of any court not of record, during the hearing of any cause or proceeding therein, to address any person in his or her presence in unfit, unseemly, or improper language.

[ 2012 c 117 s 117; 1911 c 115 s 1; RRS s 2696-1.]